Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-220
Child; physical examination; visual evaluation; immunization; right of refusal.

At the time the parent or guardian of any child is notified that such child must have a physical examination and a visual evaluation pursuant to section 79-214 or immunizations pursuant to section 79-217, the parent or guardian shall also be notified in writing of (1) his or her right to submit a written statement refusing a physical examination, a visual evaluation, or immunization for his or her child and (2) a telephone number or other contact information to assist the parent or guardian in receiving information regarding free or reduced-cost visual evaluations for low-income families who qualify.

Laws 1979, LB 59, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-444.04;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 24;

Laws 2005, LB 114, § 2.